Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 12. Miscellaneous.

§ 50-73.72.
Construction and application.

This Act shall be so applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this Act among states enacting it.

History.

1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.73.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

History.

1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.74.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

50-73.74

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.75.
Rules for cases not provided for in this chapter.

In any case not provided for in this chapter the provisions of the Uniform Partnership Act Chapter 2.2 (§

50-73.79

et seq.) shall govern.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1996, c. 292.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Construction. —

Va. Code Ann. §

50-73.26

governs a limited partner’s right to seek information, so the Virginia Uniform Partnership Act (VUPA) does not apply; the VUPA would only apply where there is a conflict between the operating agreement and the Code. The VRULPA does not provide guidance for resolving issues between the operating agreement and the VRULPA, which in turn means that the court must look to the VUPA to resolve such a conflict. Gordon v. Arrowhead Apts. Ltd. P'ship, 104 Va. Cir. 355, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 62 (Fairfax County Mar. 23, 2020).

§ 50-73.76.
Application to existing limited partnership.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to all limited partnerships, and to their partners, existing on January 1, 1987.

History.

1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.76:1.
Property title records.

Whenever the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission reflect that a domestic or foreign limited partnership has changed or corrected its name, merged into a domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, converted into a domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust or partnership, or domesticated in or from another jurisdiction, the clerk of the Commission, upon request, shall issue a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication. The certificate may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the limited partnership is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

Whenever a foreign limited partnership has changed or corrected its name, merged into a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, converted into another type of business entity, or domesticated in another jurisdiction, and it cannot or chooses not to obtain a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication from the clerk of the Commission pursuant to subsection A, a similar certificate by any competent authority of the foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of formation may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the limited partnership is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

History.

2007, c. 771.

§ 50-73.77.
Transition and savings provisions.

The repeal of Chapter 2 (§

50-44

et seq.) of this title shall not impair the continued existence of a limited partnership formed prior to January 1, 1987.

The provisions of this chapter requiring limited partnerships formed under the laws of the Commonwealth (i) to file a certificate of limited partnership under §

50-73.11

, (ii) to maintain a principal office, registered office, and registered agent as required by §

50-73.4

, (iii) to keep certain partnership records at its principal office as required by §

50-73.8

, and (iv) to adopt a name that complies with the requirements of §

50-73.2

, shall not apply to limited partnerships formed prior to January 1, 1987, under the laws of the Commonwealth until the first to occur of (a) the voluntary filing of a certificate under subsection C of this section or (b) such time as the limited partnership would have been required to file an amendment to its certificate pursuant to § 50-67 as it existed prior to its repeal.

At the time a limited partnership formed prior to January 1, 1987, under the laws of the Commonwealth voluntarily elects to file a certificate under this subsection or is required to file a certificate under this subsection pursuant to the provisions of subsection B of this section, the limited partnership shall file an amended and restated certificate of limited partnership (i) in which it shall adopt a name meeting the requirements of §

50-73.2

and (ii) which shall contain (a) the information required by §

50-73.11

, (b) the name under which its certificate of limited partnership, or any amendment thereto, was last filed under the Virginia Uniform Limited Partnership Act (§

50-44

et seq.) as it existed prior to its repeal, and (c) the counties or cities in which its certificate of limited partnership, or any amendments thereto, had last been filed in the clerk’s office of such jurisdictions pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Uniform Limited Partnership Act as it existed prior to its repeal. Within 30 days of such filing with the Commission, the limited partnership shall forward a copy of the amended and restated certificate of limited partnership, certified by the clerk of the Commission, to the clerk’s office or offices shown in the amended and restated certificate as being the clerk’s office or offices in which its certificate of limited partnership, or any amendment thereto, had last been filed pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Uniform Limited Partnership Act as it existed prior to its repeal, with the appropriate fee required for each such filing.

The failure to file an amended and restated certificate in compliance with subsection C of this section shall not impair the continued existence of a limited partnership formed prior to January 1, 1987, or the rights and liabilities of the parties in such a limited partnership set forth in § 50-66 as it existed prior to repeal, but the general partners of such a limited partnership shall be liable for any false statements in the limited partnership’s certificate of limited partnership as provided in §

50-73.18

.

The provisions of §

50-73.7

permitting service of process on a limited partnership’s registered agent or the Clerk of the Commission shall not apply to a limited partnership formed under the laws of the Commonwealth prior to January 1, 1987, until such time as the limited partnership files an amended and restated certificate of limited partnership pursuant to subsection C of this section.

At the time a limited partnership formed before January 1, 1987, that has not previously filed a certificate of limited partnership under §

50-73.11

, would have been required to cancel its certificate pursuant to § 50-67 as it existed before its repeal, the limited partnership shall file with the Commission an amended and restated certificate of limited partnership as described in subsection C of this section and a certificate of cancellation as described in §

50-73.52:4

.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1991, c. 434; 1993, c. 292; 1996, c. 292; 2007, c. 631; 2008, c. 586; 2010, c. 675.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 deleted former subsection B, which read: “[Repealed.]”; redesignated former subsections C through G as present subsections B though F; in present subsection B, inserted “registered office,” in clause (ii) and substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” in the second clause (i); in subsection C, substituted “subsection B” for “subsection C” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “Within 30 days of such filing with the Commission, the limited partnership shall forward a copy of the amended and restated certificate of limited partnership, certified by the clerk of the Commission,” for “The Commission shall forward a copy of the amended and restated certificate” at the beginning and inserted “with the appropriate fee required for each such filing” at the end of the second sentence; in subsection D, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” near the beginning and inserted “limited” three times preceding “partnership”; and substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” in subsections E and F.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, substituted “§ 50.73.52:4” for “§

50-73.13

” at the end of subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; in subsection B, twice substituted “principal” for “specified,” and substituted “(a)” and “(b)” for “(i)” and “(ii)”, respectively; and inserted (a), (b), and (c) designations in C (ii).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 100.

§ 50-73.78.
Limited partnership as registered limited liability partnership.

A limited partnership is a registered limited liability partnership as well as a limited partnership if it:

Registers as a limited liability partnership as provided in §

50-73.132

of the Virginia Uniform Partnership Act (§

50-73.79

et seq.), as permitted by its written partnership agreement or, if its written partnership agreement is silent, with the consent of partners required to amend its written partnership agreement, provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of §

50-73.83

, a statement of registration as a limited liability partnership filed by a limited partnership shall be executed by any one or more authorized general partners; and

Has a name that either: (i) complies with the requirements of clause (i) of subsection A of §

50-73.2

and subsection A of §

50-73.133

or (ii) contains the words “Registered Limited Liability Limited Partnership” or “Limited Liability Limited Partnership” or the abbreviation “R.L.L.L.P.” or “L.L.L.P.” or the designation “RLLLP” or “LLLP.”

In applying §

50-73.132

to a limited partnership, all references to partners mean general partners.

If a limited partnership is a registered limited liability partnership, §

50-73.96

applies to its general partners and to any of its limited partners who, under other provisions of this chapter, are liable for the debts or obligations of the partnership.

If a limited partnership is a registered limited liability partnership, except to the extent that the provisions of this section and Article 9.1 (§

50-73.132

et seq.) of Chapter 2.2 make a distinction between a domestic partnership and a limited partnership, the provisions of Article 9.1 (§

50-73.132

et seq.) of Chapter 2.2 shall apply to a limited partnership to the same extent that such provisions apply to a domestic partnership that has registered for status as a registered limited liability partnership.

History.

1995, c. 116; 1996, c. 292; 1998, c. 163; 2007, c. 631; 2012, c. 63.

Cross references.

As to corporate name under Virginia Stock Corporation Act, see §

13.1-630

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in subdivision 1, inserted “provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of §

50-73.83

, a statement of registration as a limited liability partnership filed by a limited partnership shall be executed by any one or more authorized general partners”; and in subdivision 2, inserted “either: (i)” and substituted “clause (i) of subdivision 1 of §

50-73.2

and subsection A of §

50-73.133

or (ii) contains the words ‘Registered Limited Liability Limited Partnership’ or ‘Limited Liability Limited Partnership’ or the abbreviation ‘R.L.L.L.P.’ or ‘L.L.L.P.’ or the designation ‘RLLLP’ or ‘LLLP’ ” for “§§

50-73.2

and

50-73.133

.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 added subsection D.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63, in subsection A, deleted “Chapter 2.2” following “Virginia Uniform Partnership Act” in subdivision A 1 and substituted “subsection A of §

50-73.2

” for “subdivision 1 of §

50-73.2

” in subdivision A 2; and in subsection D, deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 2.2” in two places. For applicability, see Editor’s note.